District of Columbia statutes.
24-201.15

Accountability for safekeeping of prisoners.

The Superintendent of the Washington Asylum and Jail shall be accountable for the safekeeping of all prisoners legally committed thereto.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1379, ch. 854, § 1191
Mar. 2, 1911, 36 Stat. 1003, ch. 192
Mar. 16, 1926, 44 Stat. 209, ch. 58, § 6
This section is referenced in § 24-201.13.
1981 Ed., § 24-415.
1973 Ed., § 24-415.